Utah statutes.
41-6a-401.3.   Accident involving injury -- Stop at accident -- Penalty.

(1)  As used in this section, "serious bodily injury" means bodily injury which involves a substantial risk of death, unconsciousness, extreme physical pain, protracted and obvious disfigurement, or protracted loss or impairment of the function of a bodily member, organ, or mental faculty.

(2)  The operator of a vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury to a person shall:

(a)  immediately stop the vehicle at the scene of the accident or as close to it as possible without obstructing traffic more than is necessary; and

(b)  remain at the scene of the accident until the operator has fulfilled the requirements of Section 41-6a-401.7.

(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), a person who violates the provisions of Subsection (2) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than $750.

(b)  A person who violates the provisions of Subsection (2):

(i)  is guilty of a third degree felony if the accident resulted in serious bodily injury to a person; and

(ii)  shall be fined not less than $750.

